Washington statutes.
RCW 35.82.250

Housing applications by farmers.

The owner of any farm operated, or worked upon, by farmers of low income in need of safe and sanitary housing may file an application with a housing authority of a county requesting that it provide for a safe and sanitary dwelling or dwellings for occupancy by such farmers of low income. Such applications shall be received and examined by housing authorities in connection with the formulation of projects or programs to provide housing for farmers of low income.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.82.250. Prior: 1941 c 69 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 6889-23b. Formerly RCW 74.24.250.]